Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Watercraft 19 feet or less. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) and subdivision 1a, the fee for a watercraft license for watercraft 19 feet or less in length is deleted text begin $59deleted text end new text begin $27new text end . (b) The watercraft license fee is: (1) for watercraft, other than personal watercraft, 19 feet in length or less that is offered for rent or lease, deleted text begin $14deleted text end new text begin $9new text end ; (2) for a sailboat, 19 feet in length or less, deleted text begin $23deleted text end new text begin $10.50new text end ; (3) for a watercraft 19 feet in length or less used by a nonprofit corporation for teaching boat and water safety, as provided in subdivision 4; (4) for a watercraft owned by a dealer under a dealer's license, as provided in subdivision 5; (5) for a personal watercraft, deleted text begin including one offered for rent or lease, $85deleted text end new text begin $37.50new text end ; and (6) for a watercraft less than 17 feet in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (1) to (5), deleted text begin $36deleted text end new text begin $18new text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Canoes, kayaks, sailboards, paddleboards, paddleboats, or rowing shells. The fee for a watercraft license for a canoe, kayak, sailboard, paddleboard, paddleboat, or rowing shell over ten feet in length is deleted text begin $23deleted text end new text begin $10.50new text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Watercraft over 19 feet. Except as provided in subdivisions 1a, 3, 4, and 5, the watercraft license fee: (1) for a watercraft more than 19 feet but less than 26 feet in length is deleted text begin $113deleted text end new text begin $45new text end ; (2) for a watercraft 26 feet but less than 40 feet in length is deleted text begin $164deleted text end new text begin $67.50new text end ; and (3) for a watercraft 40 feet in length or longer is deleted text begin $209deleted text end new text begin $90new text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Watercraft new text begin over 19 feet new text end for deleted text begin commercial usedeleted text end new text begin hirenew text end . The license fee for new text begin a new text end watercraft deleted text begin used primarily for charter fishing, commercial fishing, commercial passenger carrying, or other commercial operationdeleted text end new text begin more than 19 feet in length for hire with an operatornew text end is deleted text begin $164deleted text end new text begin $75new text end each. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Watercraft used by nonprofit corporation for teaching. The watercraft license fee for a watercraft used by a nonprofit organization for teaching boat and water safety is deleted text begin $8deleted text end new text begin $4.50new text end each. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Dealer's license. There is no separate fee for watercraft owned by a dealer under a dealer's license. The fee for a dealer's license is deleted text begin $142deleted text end new text begin $67.50new text end . Sec. 7. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.005, subdivision 11a, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 7 are effective July 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06865 86B.005 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 11a. Other commercial operation. "Other commercial operation" means use of a watercraft for work, rather than recreation, to transport equipment, goods, and materials on public waters.